Utah statutes.
79-4-303.   Board meetings -- Quorum.

(1)  The board shall meet at least once every quarter, but special meetings may be held by call of the chairman or at the request of two members of the board.

(2)  Four members of the board shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 344, 2009 General Session

